Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2607
Consumer, defined.

Consumer means any of the following:

(1) An individual or entity purchasing an assistive device if the assistive device was purchased from an assistive device dealer or manufacturer for purposes other than resale;

(2) An individual or entity to whom the assistive device is transferred for purposes other than resale if the transfer occurs before the expiration of an express warranty applicable to the assistive device;

(3) An individual or entity who may enforce the warranty; or

(4) An individual or entity who leases an assistive device from an assistive device lessor under a written lease.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 7.